Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF683.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2513YH (5) 91 ss/ns H.F. 683 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 11.5D Government efficiency 1 investigations ââ enforcement. 2 The auditor of state may, at the discretion of the auditor, 3 investigate departments of state government for the purposes of 4 pursuing efficiency in state government. Such an investigation 5 is considered an authorized audit or examination for purposes 6 of subchapter IX, and the provisions of subchapter IX apply. 7